Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Chapter 8. Proceedings to Acquire Drainage Rights.

§ 21-428.
Right to drain land through lands of others.

Any person desiring to drain his lands through the lands of others may apply to the circuit court of the county or corporation court of the city in which the whole or a part of the last mentioned lands lie, for the appointment of commissioners to ascertain and report upon the propriety of granting such application and the damages that may be sustained by the party or parties through whose lands the drain is proposed to be run. Notice of such application shall be given to the proprietors of the lands through which such drain is to be run in the manner prescribed by Article 2 (§§

25.1-205

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 25.1.

History.

Code 1919, § 5293.

Cross references.

As to creation, enlargement, contraction, etc., of sanitary districts, see §

15.2-858

.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 5 of Title 17, providing for corporation courts in general, which are referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1973, c. 544. See now provisions as to circuit courts, §

17.1-500

et seq.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on property for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1834 (1975).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-571 Deed of Easement for Storm Drainage and Sanitary Sewer.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Drains, Sewers and Drainage Districts, § 8; 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, § 5.

§ 21-429.
Damages to be ascertained by commissioners; notice to be given.

If the court, on hearing the matter, thinks it proper, it shall issue its order appointing five commissioners, who shall be freeholders, any three of whom may act, who shall, on being served with a copy of the order, go upon the land, and after being duly sworn, ascertain and report what damages, if any, may be sustained by the party or parties through whose lands the drain is to be run; but the commissioners, before proceeding to execute the order, shall give to the parties interested, and to the tenants in possession, at least ten days’ notice of the time appointed by them for the execution of the same in the manner prescribed by §

21-428

.

History.

Code 1919, § 5294.

§ 21-430.
Mode of draining to be described.

The commissioners shall also inquire and report whether the mode of draining his land proposed by the applicant be proper and shall describe the same specifically.

History.

Code 1919, § 5295.

§ 21-431.
Payment of damages and costs.

If the leave prayed for be granted by the court, it shall be made a matter of record and the applicant shall, before he proceeds therein, pay or secure to the satisfaction of the parties entitled thereto the compensation, if any, ascertained by the commissioners and all the costs of the proceeding, including the sum of two dollars per day to each of the commissioners for each day that they may be engaged in executing the order aforesaid. And he shall make and keep open such cut, drain or culvert as he is allowed to make, at his own expense.

History.

Code 1919, § 5296.

§ 21-432.
Construction of culverts, etc., under mill canals.

This chapter shall be so construed as to authorize the court therein named to allow owners of lands desirous of draining the same the right to construct trunks or culverts under the beds of mill canals in cases where the same may be necessary, subject to the same regulations and provisions as are prescribed herein in regard to the draining of lands through the lands of others; provided, that such trunks or culverts shall be so located and arranged as not to obstruct or interfere with the passage of the water through such canals.

History.

Code 1919, § 5297.